Georgia statutes. TITLE 47 Retirement and Pensions
Article 4 Revenues Collected from Fines, Bonds, and Fees

47-14-50.
“Collecting authority” defined; payments to fund from fines and bonds collected in criminal and quasi-criminal cases; duty of collecting authority to record and remit; penalty for late payment.

As used in this Code section, the term “collecting authority” means, without limitation, any county or state officer, including any judicial officer or employee, or any other person representing or acting on behalf of any court, the state, or a political subdivision of the state who in his or her capacity collects or receives fines or forfeitures as provided in this Code section.

The sum of $2.00 shall be paid to the board from each fine collected and each bond forfeited and collected in any criminal or quasi-criminal case for violation of state law if the case is tried in any court of this state in which the clerk of such court is eligible for membership in this retirement fund. The collecting authority shall pay such amounts to the board each month or at such other times as the board may provide. Such amounts shall be due on the first day of the month following the month in which they were collected but shall be deemed timely if received by the board on or before the fifteenth day of the month; provided, however, that for purposes of calculating late payment penalties, the due date shall be the first day of the month. It shall be the duty of the collecting authority to keep accurate records of the amounts due the board. Such records may be audited by the board at any time. The sums remitted to the board under this Code section shall be used for the purposes provided for in this chapter.

If the clerk or other collecting authority whose duty it is to collect and remit moneys to the fund under subsection (b) of this Code section shall fail to remit such moneys within 60 days of the date on which such remittal is due, such moneys shall be delinquent; and there shall be imposed, in addition to the principal amount due, a specific penalty in the amount of 5 percent of the principal amount per month for each month during which the funds continue to be delinquent, provided that such penalty shall not exceed a total of 25 percent of the principal due. In addition to such penalty, interest shall be charged on the delinquent moneys at the rate of 6 percent per annum from the date such moneys became delinquent until they are paid. All moneys which have not been paid to the fund within 60 days of the due date shall be delinquent. By affirmative vote of all members, the board, upon the payment of the delinquent moneys together with interest and for good cause shown, may waive the specific penalty otherwise charged under this subsection.

History.

Ga. L. 1952, p. 238, § 8; Ga. L. 1962, p. 67, § 1; Ga. L. 1966, p. 222, § 2; Ga. L. 1969, p. 688, § 1; Ga. L. 1970, p. 177, § 1; Ga. L. 1976, p. 729, § 1; Ga. L. 1992, p. 2348, § 1; Ga. L. 2002, p. 470, § 4; Ga. L. 2008, p. 722, § 2/SB 460; Ga. L. 2009, p. 824, § 2/HB 487.

The 2008 amendment,

effective July 1, 2008, added subsection (a); redesignated former subsections (a) and (b) as present subsections (b) and (c), respectively; in subsection (b), substituted “month” for “quarter” in the second sentence, and added the third sentence; and, in subsection (c), substituted “subsection (b)” for “subsection (a)” near the beginning of the first sentence, and substituted “All moneys” for “After April 1, 1966, all moneys” at the beginning of the third sentence.

The 2009 amendment,

effective May 5, 2009, substituted “$2.00” for “$1.75” near the beginning of the first sentence of subsection (b).

47-14-51.
[Effective until July 1, 2023. See note.] Payments to the fund from fees collected in certain civil actions and for recording of instruments pertaining to real estate; records; audit of records; use of sums remitted; failure of clerk to remit.

In addition to all other legal costs, the sum of $1.00 shall be charged and collected in each civil suit, action, case, or proceeding filed in the superior courts or in any other court of this state in which a clerk eligible for membership in this retirement fund is clerk, including, without limiting the generality of the foregoing, all adoptions, charters, certiorari, applications by a personal representative for leave to sell or reinvest, trade name registrations, applications for change of name, and all other proceedings of a civil nature, filed in the superior courts or other such courts.

In addition to all other legal costs, the sum of 50¢ shall be charged and collected in addition to any other fees or costs for the processing of all instruments pertaining to real estate filed in the superior courts.

The clerks shall collect the fees provided for in subsections (a) and (b) of this Code section, and the fees so collected shall be remitted to the board on a monthly basis or at such time as the board may provide. Such amounts shall be due on the first day of the month following the month in which they were collected but shall be deemed timely if received by the board on or before the fifteenth day of the month; provided, however, that for purposes of calculating late payment penalties, the due date shall be the first day of the month. It shall be the duty of the clerks to keep accurate records of the amounts due the board under this Code section, and such records may be audited by the board at any time. The sums remitted to the board under this Code section shall be used for the purposes provided in this chapter.

If the clerk or other authority whose duty it is to collect and remit moneys to the fund under subsection (a) of this Code section fails to remit such moneys within 60 days of the date on which such remittal is due, such moneys shall be delinquent; and there shall be imposed, in addition to the principal amount due, a specific penalty in the amount of 5 percent of the principal amount per month for each month during which the funds continue to be delinquent, provided that such penalty shall not exceed a total of 25 percent of the principal due. In addition to such penalty, interest shall be charged on the delinquent moneys at the rate of 6 percent per annum from the date such moneys became delinquent until they are paid. All moneys which have not been paid to the fund within 60 days of the due date shall be delinquent. By affirmative vote of all members, the board, upon the payment of the delinquent moneys together with interest and for good cause shown, may waive the specific penalty otherwise charged under this subsection.

The sum of $1.00 shall be paid out of the fees charged and collected pursuant to Title 15 in each civil suit, action, case, or proceeding filed in the superior courts or in any other court of this state in which a clerk eligible for membership in this retirement fund is clerk and shall be remitted to the board as provided in subsection (c) of this Code section. Such fees shall include, without limiting the generality of the foregoing, all adoptions, charters, certiorari, applications by a personal representative for leave to sell or reinvest, trade name registrations, applications for change of name, and all other proceedings of a civil nature filed in the superior courts or other such courts.

History.

Ga. L. 1977, p. 1098, §§ 1, 2; Ga. L. 1983, p. 555, § 1; Ga. L. 2002, p. 470, § 5; Ga. L. 2008, p. 722, § 3/SB 460; Ga. L. 2009, p. 824, § 3/HB 487.

Delayed effective date.

Code Section 47-14-51 is set out twice in this Code. This version is effective until July 1, 2023. For version effective July 1, 2023, see the following version.

The 2008 amendment,

effective July 1, 2008, in subsection (c), in the first sentence, inserted a comma following “Code section” and substituted “monthly” for “quarterly”, added the second sentence, and inserted a comma after “Code section” in the third sentence; and added subsection (d).

The 2009 amendment,

effective May 5, 2009, added subsection (e).

47-14-51.
[Effective July 1, 2023. See note.] Payments to the fund from fees collected in certain civil actions and for recording of instruments pertaining to real estate; records; audit of records; use of sums remitted; failure of clerk to remit.

In addition to all other legal costs, the sum of $1.00 shall be charged and collected in each civil suit, action, case, or proceeding filed in the superior courts or in any other court of this state in which a clerk eligible for membership in this retirement fund is clerk, including, without limiting the generality of the foregoing, all adoptions, charters, petitions for review, applications by a personal representative for leave to sell or reinvest, trade name registrations, applications for change of name, and all other proceedings of a civil nature, filed in the superior courts or other such courts.

In addition to all other legal costs, the sum of 50¢ shall be charged and collected in addition to any other fees or costs for the processing of all instruments pertaining to real estate filed in the superior courts.

The clerks shall collect the fees provided for in subsections (a) and (b) of this Code section, and the fees so collected shall be remitted to the board on a monthly basis or at such time as the board may provide. Such amounts shall be due on the first day of the month following the month in which they were collected but shall be deemed timely if received by the board on or before the fifteenth day of the month; provided, however, that for purposes of calculating late payment penalties, the due date shall be the first day of the month. It shall be the duty of the clerks to keep accurate records of the amounts due the board under this Code section, and such records may be audited by the board at any time. The sums remitted to the board under this Code section shall be used for the purposes provided in this chapter.

If the clerk or other authority whose duty it is to collect and remit moneys to the fund under subsection (a) of this Code section fails to remit such moneys within 60 days of the date on which such remittal is due, such moneys shall be delinquent; and there shall be imposed, in addition to the principal amount due, a specific penalty in the amount of 5 percent of the principal amount per month for each month during which the funds continue to be delinquent, provided that such penalty shall not exceed a total of 25 percent of the principal due. In addition to such penalty, interest shall be charged on the delinquent moneys at the rate of 6 percent per annum from the date such moneys became delinquent until they are paid. All moneys which have not been paid to the fund within 60 days of the due date shall be delinquent. By affirmative vote of all members, the board, upon the payment of the delinquent moneys together with interest and for good cause shown, may waive the specific penalty otherwise charged under this subsection.

The sum of $1.00 shall be paid out of the fees charged and collected pursuant to Title 15 in each civil suit, action, case, or proceeding filed in the superior courts or in any other court of this state in which a clerk eligible for membership in this retirement fund is clerk and shall be remitted to the board as provided in subsection (c) of this Code section. Such fees shall include, without limiting the generality of the foregoing, all adoptions, charters, petitions for review, applications by a personal representative for leave to sell or reinvest, trade name registrations, applications for change of name, and all other proceedings of a civil nature filed in the superior courts or other such courts.

History.

Ga. L. 1977, p. 1098, §§ 1, 2; Ga. L. 1983, p. 555, § 1; Ga. L. 2002, p. 470, § 5; Ga. L. 2008, p. 722, § 3/SB 460; Ga. L. 2009, p. 824, § 3/HB 487; Ga. L. 2022, p. 767, § 2-37/HB 916.

Delayed effective date.

Code Section 47-14-51 is set out twice in this Code. This version, as set out above, is effective July 1, 2023. For version effective until July 1, 2023, see the preceding version.

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2023, substituted “petitions for review” for “certioriari” in subsection (a) and in the second sentence in subsection (e). See Editor’s notes for applicability.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2022, p. 767, § 3-1/HB 916, not codified by the General Assembly, makes this Code section applicable to petitions for review filed in superior or state court on or after July 1, 2023.